Vermont, session 2025-2026, H325.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 26 V.S.A. chapter 55, subchapter 3 is added to read:
Subchapter 3. School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact
§ 3041a. SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE LICENSURE
COMPACT; ADOPTION
This subchapter is the Vermont adoption of the School Psychologist
Interstate Licensure Compact. The form, format, and text of the Compact have
been conformed to the conventions of the Vermont Statutes Annotated. It is
the intent of the General Assembly that this subchapter be interpreted as
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 2 of 35
substantively the same as the School psychologist Interstate Licensure
Compact that is enacted by other compact party states.
§ 3041b. PURPOSE
The purpose of this compact is to facilitate the interstate practice of
school psychology in educational or school settings and, in so doing, to
improve the availability of school psychological services to the public.
This compact is intended to establish a pathway to allow school
psychologists to obtain equivalent licenses to provide school psychological
services in any member state. In this way, this compact shall enable the
member states to ensure that safe and effective school psychological
services are available and delivered by appropriately qualified
professionals in their educational settings. To facilitate the objectives
described in this section, this compact:
(1) enables school psychologists who qualify for receipt of an
equivalent license to practice in other member states without first
satisfying burdensome and duplicative requirements;
(2) promotes the mobility of school psychologists between and
among the member states in order to address workforce shortages and to
ensure that safe and reliable school psychological services are available in
each member state;
(3) enhances the public accessibility of school psychological
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 3 of 35
services by increasing the availability of qualified, licensed school
psychologists through the establishment of an efficient and streamlined
pathway for licensees to practice in other member states;
(4) preserves and respects the authority of each member state to
protect the health and safety of its residents by ensuring that only qualified,
licensed professionals are authorized to provide school psychological
services within that state;
(5) requires school psychologists practicing within a member state
to comply with the scope of practice laws present in the state where the
school psychological services are being provided;
(6) promotes cooperation between the member states in regulating
the practice of school psychology within those states; and
(7) facilitates the relocation of military members and their spouses
who are licensed to provide school psychological services.
§ 3041c. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Active military member” means any person with full-time duty
status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the
National Guard and Reserve.
(2) “Adverse action” means disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed
on a license by a state licensing authority.
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 4 of 35
(3) “Alternative program” means a non-disciplinary, prosecutorial
diversion, monitoring, or practice remediation process entered into in lieu of an
adverse action which is applicable to a school psychologist and approved by
the state licensing authority of a member state in which the participating school
psychologist is licensed. This includes, but is not limited to, programs to
which licensees with substance abuse or addiction issues may be referred in
lieu of an adverse action.
(4) “Commissioner” means the individual appointed by a member state
to serve as the representative to the Commission for that member state.
(5) “Compact” means this School Psychologist Interstate Licensure
Compact.
(6) “Continuing professional education” means a requirement, imposed
by a member state as a condition of license renewal to provide evidence of
successful participation in professional educational activities relevant to the
provision of school psychological services
(7) “Criminal background check” means the submission of fingerprints
or other biometric-information for a license applicant for the purpose of
obtaining that applicant’s criminal history record information, as defined in 28
C.F.R. § 20.3(d), and the state’s criminal history record repository as 81
defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 5 of 35
(8) “Doctoral level degree” means a graduate degree program that
consists of at least 90 graduate semester hours in the field of school
psychology, including a supervised internship.
(9) “Encumbered license” means a license that a state licensing
authority has limited in any way other than through an alternative program,
including temporary or provisional licenses.
(10) “Executive committee” means the Commission’s chair, vice chair,
secretary, and treasurer and any other commissioners as may be determined by
Commission rule or bylaw.
(11) “Equivalent license” means a license to practice school psychology
which a member state has identified as a license which may be provided to
school psychologists from other member states pursuant to this compact.
(12) “Home state” means the member state that issued the home state
license to the licensee and is the licensee’s primary state of practice.
(13) “Home state license” means the license that is not an encumbered
license issued by the home state to provide school psychological services.
(14) “License” means a current license, certification, or other
authorization granted by a member state’s licensing authority that permits an
individual to provide school psychological services.
(15) “Licensee” means an individual who holds a license from a
member state to provide school psychological services.
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 6 of 35
(16) “Member state” means a state that has enacted the compact and
been admitted to the Commission in accordance with the provisions herein and
Commission rules.
(17) “Model compact” means the model language for the School
Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact on file with the Council of State
Governments or other entity as designated by the Commission.
(18) “Practice of school psychology” means the delivery school
psychological services.
(19) “Qualifying national exam” means a national licensing examination
endorsed by the National Association of School Psychologists and any other
exam as approved by the rules of the Commission.
(20) “Qualifying school psychologist education program” means an
education program which awards a specialist-level or doctoral-level degree or
equivalent upon completion and is approved by the rules of the Commission as
meeting the necessary minimum educational standards to ensure that its
graduates are ready, qualified, and able to engage in the practice of school
psychology.
(21) “Remote state” means a member state other than the home state
where a licensee holds a license through the compact.
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 7 of 35
(22) “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by an entity, including but
not limited to the Commission and the state licensing authority of each
member state, that has the force of law.
(23) “School psychological services” means academic, mental, and
behavioral health services including assessment, prevention, consultation, and
collaboration, intervention, and evaluation provided by a school psychologist
in a school, as outlined in applicable professional standards as determined by
Commission rule.
(24) “School psychologist” means an individual who has met the
requirements to obtain a home state license that legally conveys the
professional title of school psychologist, or its equivalent as determined by the
rules of the Commission.
(25) “School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission”
or “Commission” means the joint government agency established by this
compact whose membership consists of representatives from each member
state that has enacted the compact, and as further described in section 3041h of
this title.
(26) “Scope of practice” means the procedures, actions, and processes a
school psychologist licensed in a state is permitted to undertake in that State
and the circumstances under which that licensee is permitted to undertake
those procedures, actions, and processes. Such procedures, actions, and
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 8 of 35
processes, and the circumstances under which they may be undertaken, may be
established through means including, but not limited to, statute, regulations,
case law, and other processes available to the state licensing authority or other
government agency.
(27) “Specialist-level degree” means a degree program that requires at
least 60 graduate semester hours or equivalent in the field of school
psychology including a supervised internship.
(28) “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the
United States of America.
(29) “State licensing authority” means a member state’s regulatory body
responsible for issuing licenses or otherwise overseeing the practice of school
psychology.
(30) “State specific requirement” means a requirement for licensure
covered in coursework or examination that includes content of unique interest
to the state.
(31) “Unencumbered license” means a license that authorizes a licensee
to engage in the full and unrestricted practice of school psychology.
§ 3041d. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
(a) To be eligible to join this compact, and to maintain eligibility as a
member state, a state must:
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 9 of 35
(1) enact a compact statute that is not materially different from the
model compact as defined in the Commission’s rules;
(2) participate in the sharing of information with other member
states as reasonably necessary to accomplish the objectives of this
compact, and as further defined in section 3041i of this title;
(3) identify and maintain with the Commission a list of equivalent
licenses available to licensees who hold a home state license under this
compact;
(4) have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating
complaints about licensees;
(5) notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the
compact and the Commission’s rules, of any adverse action taken against
a licensee, or of the availability of investigative information which
relates to a licensee or applicant for licensure;
(6) require that applicants for a home state license have;
(A) taken and passed a qualifying national exam as defined by
the rules of the Commission;
(B) completed a minimum of 1200 hours of supervised
internship, of which at least 600 must have been completed in a school,
prior to being approved for licensure; and
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 10 of 35
(C) graduated from a qualifying school psychologist education
program; and
(7) comply with the terms of this compact and the rules of the
Commission.
(b) Each member state shall grant an equivalent license to practice
school psychology in that state upon application by a licensee who
satisfies the criteria of subsection 3041e(a) of this title. Each member
state shall grant renewal of the equivalent license to a licensee who
satisfies the criteria of subsection 3041e(b) of this title.
(c) Member states may set and collect a fee for granting an
equivalent license.
§ 3041e. SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
(a) To obtain and maintain an equivalent license from a remote state under
this compact, a licensee must:
(1) hold and maintain an active home state license;
(2) satisfy any applicable state specific requirements established by the
member state after an equivalent license is granted;
(3) complete any administrative or application requirements which the
Commission may establish by rule, and pay any associated fees;
(4) complete any requirements for renewal in the home state, including
applicable continuing professional education requirements; and
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 11 of 35
(5) upon their application to receive a license under this compact,
undergo a criminal background check in the member state in which the
equivalent license is sought in accordance with the laws and regulations of
such member state.
(b) To renew an equivalent license in a member state other than the home
state, a licensee must only apply for renewal, complete a background check,
and pay renewal fees as determined by the licensing authority.
§ 3041f. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES
A licensee who is an active military member or is the spouse of an
active military member shall be deemed to hold a home state license in
any of the following locations:
(1) the licensee’s permanent residence;
(2) a member state that is the licensee’s primary state of practice;
or
(3) a member state where the licensee has relocated pursuant to a
permanent change of station (PCS).
§ 3041g. DISCIPLINE AND ADVERSE ACTIONS
(a) Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or construed to limit the
authority of a member state to investigate or impose disciplinary measures on
licensees according to the state practice laws thereof.
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 12 of 35
(b) Member states shall be authorized to receive, and shall provide, files
and information regarding the investigation and discipline, if any, of licensees
in other member states upon request. Any member state receiving such
information or files shall protect and maintain the security and confidentiality
thereof, in at least the same manner that it maintains its own investigatory or
disciplinary files and information. Prior to disclosing any disciplinary or
investigatory information received from another member state, the disclosing
state shall communicate its intention and purpose for such disclosure to the
member state which originally provided that information.
§ 3041h. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST
INTERSTATE LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
(a) The member states hereby create and establish a joint government
agency whose membership consists of all member states that have enacted
the compact, and this agency shall be known as the School Psychologist
Interstate Licensure Compact Commission. The Commission is an
instrumentality of the member states acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one state. The Commission shall come into
existence on or after the effective date of the compact as set forth in section
3041l of this title.
(b) Membership, voting, and meetings.
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 13 of 35
(1) Each member state shall have and be limited to one delegate
selected by that member state’s state licensing authority.
(2) The delegate shall be the primary administrative officer of the
member state licensing authority or their designee who is an employee of
the member state licensing authority.
(3) The Commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office
for delegates and may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
(4) The Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
delegate from office.
(5) A member state’s licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its
delegate occurring on the Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
(6) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters before
the Commission requiring a vote by Commission delegates.
(7) A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates to meet by
telecommunication, videoconference, or other means of communication.
(8) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The
Commission may meet by telecommunication, video conference, or other
similar electronic means.
(c) The Commission shall have the following powers:
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 14 of 35
(1) establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
(2) establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
(3) establish and amend rules and bylaws;
(4) establish the procedure through which a licensee may change
their home state;
(5) maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
(6) meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions
of this compact, the Commission’s rules, and the bylaws;
(7) initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of
the Commission, provided that the standing of any member state licensing
authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(8) maintain and certify records and information provided to a
member state as the authenticated business records of the Commission, and
designate an agent to do so on the Commission’s behalf;
(9) purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(10) borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including,
but not limited to, employees of a member state;
(11) conduct an annual financial review;
(12) hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation,
define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the
purposes of the compact, and establish the Commission’s personnel
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 15 of 35
policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of
personnel, and other related personnel matters;
(13) assess and collect fees;
(14) accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of
money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same, provided that at all
times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or
conflict of interest, or both;
(15) lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any
property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
(16) sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
(17) establish a budget and make expenditures;
(18) borrow money;
(19) appoint committees, including standing committees, composed
of members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and
consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be
designated in this compact and the bylaws;
(20) provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law
enforcement agencies;
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 16 of 35
(21) establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair
and a vice chair;
(22) determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially
different from the model compact language such that the state would not
qualify for participation in the compact; and
(23) perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to
achieve the purposes of this compact.
(d) The executive committee.
(1) The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
Commission according to the terms of this compact. The powers, duties, and
responsibilities of the executive committee shall include:
(A) oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the
compact including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the
compact, its rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
(B) recommend to the Commission changes to the rules or bylaws,
changes to this compact legislation, fees charged to member states, fees
charged to licensees, and other fees;
(C) ensure compact administration services are appropriately
provided, including by contract;
(D) prepare and recommend the budget;
(E) maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission;
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 17 of 35
(F) monitor compact compliance of member states and provide
compliance reports to the Commission;
(G) establish additional committees as necessary;
(H) exercise the powers and duties of the Commission during
the interim between Commission meetings, except for adopting or
amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any
other powers and duties expressly reserved to the Commission by rule
or bylaw; and
(I) other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
(2) The executive committee shall be composed of up to seven
members:
(A) the chair and vice chair of the Commission shall be
voting members of the executive committee; and
(B) the Commission shall elect five voting members from the
current membership of the Commission.
(3) The Commission may remove any member of the executive
committee as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
(4) The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
(A) Executive committee meetings shall be open to the
public, except that the executive committee may meet in a closed,
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 18 of 35
nonpublic meeting as provided in subdivision (f)(2) of this section.
(B) The executive committee shall give 30 days’ notice of its
meetings, posted on its website and as determined to provide notice to
persons with an interest in the business of the Commission.
(C) The executive committee may hold a special meeting in
accordance with subdivision (f)(1)(B) of this section.
(e) The Commission shall adopt and provide to the member states
an annual report.
(f) Meetings of the Commission.
(1) All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the
Commission may meet in a closed, nonpublic meeting as provided in
subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(A) Public notice for all meetings of the full Commission of
meetings shall begiven in the same manner as required under the
rulemaking provisions in section 3041j of this title, except that the
Commission may hold a special meeting as provided in subdivision (1)
of this subsection (f).
(B) The Commission may hold a special meeting when it
must meet to conduct emergency business by giving 48 hours’ notice
to all commissioners, on the Commission’s website, and other means
as provided in the Commission’s rules. The Commission’s legal
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 19 of 35
counsel shall certify that the Commission’s need to meet qualifies as
an emergency.
(2) The Commission or the executive committee or other
committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, non-public
meeting for the Commission or executive committee or other
committees of the Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
(A) noncompliance of a member state with its obligations
under the compact;
(B) the employment, compensation, discipline, or other
matters, practices, or procedures related to specific employees;
(C) current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the
Commission or by a member state’s licensing authority;
(D) current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
(E) negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of
goods, services, or real estate;
(F) accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any
person;
(G) trade secrets or commercial or financial information that
is privileged or confidential;
(H) information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 20 of 35
(I) investigative records compiled for law enforcement
purposes;
(J) information related to any investigative reports prepared
by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other committee
charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of
compliance issues pursuant to the compact;
(K) matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal
or member state law; or
(L) other matters as promulgated by the Commission by rule.
(3) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding
officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference each
relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in
the minutes.
(4) The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly
describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and
accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore,
including a description of the views expressed. All documents
considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such
minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain
under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the
Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 21 of 35
(g) Financing of the Commission.
(1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of,
the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
(2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue
sources as provided in subdivision(c)(12) of this section.
(3) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each member state and impose fees on licensees
practicing in the member states under an equivalent license to cover
the cost of the operations and activities of the Commission and its
staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual
budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by
other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for member
states shall be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission
shall promulgate by rule.
(4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior
to securing the funds adequate to meet the same, nor shall the
Commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by
and with the authority of the member state.
(5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts
and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 22 of 35
shall be subject to the financial review and accounting procedures
established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements
of funds handled by the Commission shall be subject to an annual
financial review by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the
report of the financial review shall be included in and become part of
the annual report of the Commission.
(h) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.
(1) The members, officers, executive director, employees, and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for
damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that
nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to protect any such
person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission
shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted
hereunder.
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 23 of 35
(2) The Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the Commission in
any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or
alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined
by the Commission that the person against whom the claim is made
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that
nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining
their own counsel at their own expense, and provided further, that the
actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that
person’s intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct.
(3) The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, and representative of
the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained
against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis
for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error,
or omission did not result from the intentional, willful, or wanton
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 24 of 35
misconduct of that person.
(4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct,
which shall be governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
(5) Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a member state’s state action immunity or state
action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the
Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state or federal antitrust or
anticompetitive law or regulation.
(6) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the member states or by the Commission.
§ 3041i. FACILITATING INFORMATION EXCHANGE
(a) The Commission shall provide for facilitating the exchange of
information to administer and implement the provisions of this compact in
accordance with the rules of the Commission, consistent with generally
accepted data protection principles.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a
member state shall agree to provide for the facilitation of the following
licensee information as required by the rules of the Commission, including:
(1) identifying information;
(2) licensure data;
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 25 of 35
(3) adverse actions against a license and information related thereto;
(4) nonconfidential information related to alternative program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other
information related to such participation not made confidential under
member state law;
(5) any denial of application for licensure, and the reason or reasons
for such denial;
(6) the presence of investigative information; and
(7) other information that may facilitate the administration of this
compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the rules of the
Commission.
(c) Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or construed to alter, limit,
or inhibit the power of a member state to control and maintain ownership of
its licensee information or alter, limit, or inhibit the laws or regulations
governing licensee information in the member state.
§ 3041j. RULEMAKING
(a) The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this interstate compact and the rules adopted thereunder.
Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each
rule or amendment.
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 26 of 35
(b) The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules to achieve the
intent and purpose of this interstate compact. In the event the Commission
exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond purpose and
intent of this interstate compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such
an action by the Commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect of
law in the member states.
(c) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule, by
enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the
compact within four years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule
shall have no further force and effect in any member state.
(d) Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted or ratified at a
regular or special meeting of the Commission in accordance with
Commission rules and bylaws.
(e) Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the
Commission, and at least 30 days in advance of the meeting at which the rule
will be considered and voted upon, the Commission shall file a notice of
proposed rulemaking:
(1) on the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible
platform; and
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 27 of 35
(2) on the website of each member state licensing authority or other
publicly accessible platform or the publication in which each state would
otherwise publish proposed rules.
(f) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency rule with 48 hours’ notice, with opportunity
to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures shall be
retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event
later than 90 days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this
provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in
order to:
(1) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;
(3) meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that
is established by federal law or rule; or
(4) protect public health and safety.
§ 3041k. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND
ENFORCEMENT
(a) Oversight.
(1) The executive and judicial branches of the state government in each
member state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement the compact.
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 28 of 35
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent
jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is located. The
Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it
adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any
action against a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such
similar matter.
(3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the compact and
shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure
to provide the Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order
void as to the Commission, this compact, or promulgated rules.
(b) Default, technical assistance, and termination.
(1) If the Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in
the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or
the promulgated rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the
defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the
proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the
Commission may take and shall offer training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 29 of 35
(2) The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to
the other member states.
(c) If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may
be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a supermajority
of the delegates of the member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits
conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective
date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending
state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
(d) Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only
after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of
intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s
legislature, the defaulting state’s licensing authority, and each of the
member states’ licensing authorities.
(e) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,
including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
(f) Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this compact, that
state shall immediately provide notice to all licensees within that state of
such termination. The terminated state shall continue to recognize all
licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of six months after
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 30 of 35
the date of said notice of termination.
(g) The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is
found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact unless
agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting state.
(h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by
petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal
district where the Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party
shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s
fees.
(i) Dispute resolution.
(1) Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall attempt to
resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and
between member and non-member states.
(2) The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(j) Enforcement.
(1) By majority vote as provided by rule, the Commission may initiate
legal action against a member state in default in the U. S. District Court for
the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact
and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 31 of 35
relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive
remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or the defaulting member state’s law.
(2) A member state may initiate legal action against the Commission
in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with
the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought
may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
(3) No person other than a member state shall enforce this compact
against the Commission.
§ 3041l. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
(a) The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh member state.
(1) On or after the effective date of the compact indicated above,
the Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the
charter member states to determine if the statute enacted by each such
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 32 of 35
charter member state is materially different than the model compact
statute.
(A) A charter member state whose enactment is found to be
materially different from the model compact statute shall be entitled to
the default process set forth in section 3041k of this title.
(B) If any member state is later found to be in default, or is
terminated or withdraws from the compact, the Commission shall
remain in existence and the compact shall remain in effect even if the
number of member states should be fewer than seven.
(2) Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the charter
member states shall be subject to the process set forth in subdivision
3041(c)(21) of this title to determine if their enactments are materially
different from the model compact statute and whether they qualify for
participation in the compact.
(3) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the compact prior to
the effective date of the compact or the Commission coming into
existence shall be considered to be actions of the Commission unless
specifically repudiated by the Commission.
(A) Any State that joins the compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the rules and bylaws shall be subject
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 33 of 35
to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact
becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by
the Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day
the compact becomes law in that state.
(B) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by
enacting a statute repealing the same.
(b) A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days
after enactment of the repealing statute.
(c) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing state’s licensing authority to comply with the investigative
and adverse action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the
effective date of withdrawal.
(d) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact,
a state shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all
licensees within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory
enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to
recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum
of six months after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
(1) Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 34 of 35
arrangement between a member state and a nonmember state that does
not conflict with the provisions of this compact.
(2) This compact may be amended by the member states. No
amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon
any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.
§ 3041m. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
(a) This compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation
and administration of the compact. Provisions of the compact expressly
authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed to
limit the Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
(b) The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase,
clause, sentence or provision of this compact is held by a court of competent
jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, a state
seeking participation in the compact, or of the United States, or the
applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is
held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity
of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any other
government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Commission may
deny a state’s participation in the compact or, in accordance with the
VT LEG #380620 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.325
2025 Page 35 of 35
requirements of subsection 3041k(b) of this title, terminate a member state’s
participation in the compact if it determines that a constitutional requirement
of a member state is a material departure from the compact. Otherwise, if
this compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any member
state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining
member states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as
to all severable matters.
§ 3041n. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE
LAWS
(a) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law
of a member state that is not inconsistent with the compact.
(b) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member
state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
(c) All permissible agreements between the Commission and the member
states are binding in accordance with their terms.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380620 v.1